Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Legislative Ethics Committee; Opinions; Complaints.

Sec. 24.60.130.
Select committee on legislative ethics.

There is established as a permanent interim committee within the legislative branch of state government the Select Committee on Legislative Ethics.

The committee consists of nine members, in two subcommittees, as follows:

the senate subcommittee, which consists of two members of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the minority organizational caucus, if any, appointed by the president of the senate with the concurrence by roll call vote of two-thirds of the full membership of the senate, and includes the five public members appointed under (3) of this subsection;

the house subcommittee, which consists of two members of the house, one of whom shall be a member of the minority organizational caucus, if any, appointed by the speaker of the house with the concurrence by roll call vote of two-thirds of the full membership of the house, and includes the five public members appointed under (3) of this subsection; and

five public members who are selected by the Chief Justice of the Alaska Supreme Court and who are ratified by two-thirds of the full membership of the senate and two-thirds of the full membership of the house.

No more than one public member may be a former legislator and no more than two public members of the committee may be members of the same political party.

The members of each subcommittee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair, who serve a term of two years. Neither a chair nor a vice-chair may be a member of the legislature. An officer may not hold the same office for more than two consecutive terms. The vice-chair shall act as chair in the absence of the chair. The chair selected by the senate subcommittee shall chair the full committee beginning the first day of the regular session in odd-numbered years and the chair selected by the house subcommittee shall chair the full committee beginning the first day of the regular session in even-numbered years.

Except as provided in this subsection, a vacancy on the committee shall be filled under (b) of this section. An individual who is appointed to fill a vacancy that occurs during the last 10 days of the first regular session of a legislature or during the interim between regular sessions of that legislature serves without concurrence or ratification through the 10th day of the second regular session of the legislature. An individual who is appointed to fill a vacancy that occurs during the last 10 days of the second regular session of a legislature or during the interim after the second regular session serves without concurrence or ratification through the convening of the first regular session of the next legislature.

The committee may contract for professional services and may employ staff as it considers necessary. A committee employee, including a person who provides personal services under a contract with the committee, may not be a legislator, an elected or appointed official of a state or local governmental entity, an officer of a political party, a candidate for public office, or a registered lobbyist. The legislative council shall provide office space, equipment, and additional staff support for the committee. The committee shall submit a budget for each fiscal year to the finance committees of the legislature and shall annually submit an estimated budget to the governor for information purposes in preparation of the state operating budget. Public members of the committee serve without compensation for their services, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

Each legislative member serves for the duration of the legislature during which the member is appointed. Each public member serves for a term that commences on the date the member is ratified and ends on the first day of the third regular session that follows the ratification. A public member whose term has expired continues in office until a successor has been appointed and ratified or until the 30th calendar day of the first legislative session that follows the successor’s appointment, whichever is earlier. A member of the committee may be removed from membership on the committee for failure to carry out the person’s duties as a member of the committee. A legislator may be removed with the concurrence by roll call vote of two-thirds of the full membership of the house of the legislature to which the member belongs. A public member may be removed with the concurrence by roll call vote of two-thirds of the full membership of each house of the legislature.

A member is disqualified from participating as a member in any proceeding before the committee involving a complaint against the member or an employee whose work is supervised by the member or an advisory opinion requested by the member. If a regular legislative member of the committee is disqualified under this subsection from participating in a proceeding involving a complaint, the member’s alternate shall be designated under AS

24.60.131

.

A quorum of the committee consists of a majority of the members and must include at least two legislative members and three public members. A quorum of a subcommittee established under this section consists of a majority of the members of the subcommittee and must include at least one legislative member and three public members. A vote of a majority of the members appointed to the committee or a subcommittee is required for official action.

Except to the extent that a provision would prevent the committee from complying with the confidentiality provisions of this chapter, the committee is subject to AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act) and to the procurement provisions adopted by the legislative council under AS

36.30.020

. In this subsection, “committee” includes a subcommittee.

A member or an employee or contractor of the committee may obtain access to closed committee files containing information that is made confidential by law only if the committee determines that the person has a need to obtain access to the closed files that relates to the official duties of the committee and the person seeking access.

The committee or a subcommittee shall meet at the call of the chair or a majority of the members. The committee or a subcommittee may meet by teleconference.

Except as provided in (b)(1) and (2) of this section, a member may not be a legislator, a legislative employee, an elected or appointed official required to make disclosures under AS 39.50 (public official financial disclosure), an officer of a political party, a candidate for public office, or a registered lobbyist.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 45 SLA 2012.]

Notwithstanding (h) of this section and AS

24.60.131

, if a complaint before the committee alleges a violation of this chapter by a group of legislators that includes a legislative member of the committee and that member’s alternate, the member and alternate member are disqualified from serving on the committee with regard to the complaint. If the two disqualified members of the committee are members of the majority organizational caucus, the presiding officer of the house in which the two disqualified members serve shall appoint from that house an alternate to serve with regard to the complaint. If one of the two disqualified legislative members of the committee is not a member of the majority organizational caucus, the leader of the minority organizational caucus with the greatest number of members shall appoint from that house an alternate to serve with regard to the complaint. If a complaint alleges a violation of this chapter that includes all legislative members of the majority organizational caucus of one house, the presiding officer of that house shall appoint from the other house an alternate to serve with regard to the complaint. If the complaint alleges a violation of this chapter that includes all legislative members of a minority organizational caucus of one house, the leader of that minority organizational caucus shall appoint from the other house an alternate to serve with regard to the complaint.

In this section,

“majority organizational caucus” means a group of legislators who have organized and elected a majority leader and constitute more than 50 percent of the total membership of the house or senate, as appropriate;

“minority organizational caucus” means a group of legislators who have organized and elected a minority leader and constitute at least 25 percent of the total membership of the house or senate, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am §§ 9, 10 ch 113 SLA 1986; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 167 SLA 1988; am §§ 17 — 24 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 37 — 40 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 33 SLA 1999; am §§ 35 — 37 ch 47 SLA 2007; am §§ 12, 13, 18 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsection (n) was enacted as (o) and relettered in 1998. Subsection (o) was enacted as (p) and relettered in 2007. Subsection (p) was enacted as (n), lettered in 1998 as (o), and relettered in 2007 as (p).

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 24.60.131.
Alternate members.

When appointing members of the legislature to serve on the committee under AS

24.60.130(b)

, the speaker of the house of representatives or the president of the senate, as appropriate, shall appoint an alternate member for each regular member. The alternate member shall have the same qualifications for appointment to the committee as the regular member for whom the alternate stands as alternate. The alternate member’s appointment is subject to confirmation as required for appointment of the regular member.

When selecting public members to serve on the committee under AS

24.60.130(b)

, the Chief Justice of the Alaska Supreme Court shall select one alternate public member. The alternate public member’s selection is subject to ratification as required for selection of the regular public members.

Subject to (d) of this section, if a regular member of the committee or a subcommittee is unable to participate in a proceeding other than a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

, the chair of the committee or subcommittee that holds the proceeding shall designate the regular member’s alternate to participate in place of the regular member at the proceeding, and the alternate shall participate for the duration of that proceeding unless the alternate is unable to participate.

If a regular member of the committee or a subcommittee or an alternate member appointed under (a) or (b) of this section participates at the commencement of a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

, the member shall participate for the duration of the proceeding unless the member is disqualified under AS

24.60.130(h)

or is unable to continue participating. If the participating member is disqualified under AS

24.60.130(h)

or becomes unable to participate, the chair of the committee or subcommittee that holds the proceeding shall designate the member’s alternate to participate in place of the member for the duration of the proceeding unless the alternate is disqualified or is unable to participate.

If both a regular legislative member and that member’s alternate appointed under (a) of this section are not available to participate at the commencement of a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

because they are disqualified under AS

24.60.130(h)

, the presiding officer of the house in which the two members serve shall appoint from that house an alternate and designate that alternate to participate in the proceeding; however, if the two members who are not available to participate are not members of the majority organizational caucus, the leader of the minority organizational caucus with the greatest number of members shall appoint from that house an alternate and designate that alternate to participate in the proceeding.

A designation under (c) — (e) of this section shall be treated as confidential to the same extent that the identity of the subject of a complaint is required to be kept confidential.

History.

(§ 14 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Sec. 24.60.134.
Prohibited conduct by public members and committee employees and contractors.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, in addition to complying with the other requirements of this chapter, a public member of the committee, an employee of the committee, or a person under contract to provide personal services to the committee may not, during the person’s term of office or employment or during the life of the contract, participate in

political management or in a political campaign for a candidate for election to federal, state, or local office, regardless of whether the campaign is partisan or nonpartisan, or for passage or defeat of a ballot measure of any type;

the campaign of, attend campaign fund-raising events for, or make a financial contribution to

a candidate for the legislature;

an incumbent legislator or legislative employee who is a candidate for another public office; or

a person running for another office against an incumbent legislator or legislative employee;

a fund-raising event held on behalf of a political party or attend a political party fund-raising event; or

lobbying activities that would require the person to register as a lobbyist except as required to inform the legislature concerning legislation requested by the committee or other matters related to the committee.

A violation or alleged violation of this section shall be treated as any other violation of this chapter and shall be dealt with by the committee accordingly. During the pendency of a complaint against a member, committee employee, or committee contractor, the person complained against may not participate in official action of the committee.

A person under contract to provide personal services to the committee who does so as part of a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity that includes individuals who will not be participating directly in the work performed by the entity for the committee may request the committee to exclude members of the entity from some or all of the provisions of this section. The committee may grant the request if it finds that

doing so will not lead to the appearance that the committee is subject to undue political influence; and

there is no appearance of impropriety.

History.

(§ 25 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 41, 42 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (c), in the introductory language, substituted “does so as” for “is”, inserted “sole proprietorship,” preceding “corporation”, inserted “, or other legal entity” preceding “that includes”, designated parts of (c) as (1) and (2); and made related changes.

Sec. 24.60.140.
Authority of the committee and its subcommittees.

The senate subcommittee has authority over proceedings concerning conduct by a member or former member of the senate or a person employed by a member or a committee of the senate.

The house subcommittee has authority over proceedings concerning the conduct by a member or former member of the house or a person employed by a member or a committee of the house.

The full committee has authority

over proceedings concerning the conduct by an employee of an agency of the legislature;

to review any matter arising under this chapter that would result in action being required by both houses of the legislature; and

to issue advisory opinions under AS

24.60.160

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984)

Sec. 24.60.150.
Duties of the committee.

The committee shall

adopt procedures to facilitate the receipt of inquiries and prompt rendition of its opinions;

publish annual summaries of decisions and advisory opinions with sufficient deletions in the summaries to prevent disclosing the identity of the persons involved in the decisions or opinions that have remained confidential;

publish legislative ethics materials, including an annually updated handbook on standards of ethical conduct and a bimonthly legislative newsletter, to help educate legislators, legislative employees, and public members of the committee on the subject of legislative ethics;

within 10 days of the first day of each regular session of the legislature and at other times determined by the committee, administer two types of legislative ethics courses that teach means of compliance with this chapter and are designed to give an understanding of this chapter’s purpose under AS

24.60.010

; one course, for returning legislators, legislative employees, or public members of the committee, must refresh knowledge and review compliance issues; a separate course shall be designed to give first-time legislators, legislative employees, or public members of the committee a fundamental understanding of this chapter and how to comply with it.

The committee may

recommend legislation to the legislature the committee considers desirable or necessary to promote and maintain high standards of ethical conduct in government;

subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony relating to matters before the committee, and may require the production for examination of any books or papers relating to any matter under investigation before the committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 38 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 2008)

Sec. 24.60.155.
Legislative ethics course.

A person who is a legislator, legislative employee, public member of the committee, legislative intern, or legislative volunteer shall complete a legislative ethics course administered by the committee under AS

24.60.150(a)(4)

within 10 days of the first day of the first regular session of each legislature or, if the person first takes office or begins service after the 10th day of that session, within 30 days after the person takes office or begins service. The committee may grant a person additional time to complete the course required by this section.

A legislative intern or legislative volunteer who serves fewer than 30 days in one legislature is not subject to the requirements under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 39 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 15 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Sec. 24.60.158.
Advice by staff.

The committee shall authorize and train its staff to give oral advice and provide a written informal nonbinding advice letter to persons seeking guidance as to the spirit or legal requirements of this chapter, provided that the advice is given with the express stipulations that

the opinions given are not necessarily those of the committee;

although the advice is given in good faith, the person seeking the advice relies on it at the person’s own risk; and

the advice is not binding upon the committee.

History.

(§ 26 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Sec. 24.60.160.
Advisory opinions.

On the request of the committee, the Alaska Public Offices Commission, a person to whom this chapter applies, or a person who has been newly elected to the legislature, the committee shall issue an advisory opinion within 60 days as to whether the facts and circumstances of a particular case constitute a violation of ethical standards. If it finds that it is advisable to do so, the committee may issue an opinion under this section on the request of a person who reasonably expects to become subject to this chapter within the next 45 days. The 60-day period for issuing an opinion may be extended by the committee if the person requesting the opinion consents.

An opinion issued under this section is binding on the committee in any subsequent proceedings concerning the facts and circumstances of the particular case unless material facts were omitted or misstated in the request for the advisory opinion. An opinion issued under this section must be issued with sufficient deletions to prevent disclosing the identity of the person or persons involved. Advisory opinion discussions and deliberations are confidential, unless the requester and anyone else named in the request who is covered by this chapter waives confidentiality. The committee’s final vote on the advisory opinion is a public record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 43 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 40 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

The Select Committee on Legislative Ethics maintains a public online electronic database of advisory opinions interpreting the Legislative Ethics Act.

Sec. 24.60.165.
Use of information submitted with request for advice.

The committee may not bring a complaint against a person based upon information voluntarily given to the committee by the person in connection with a good faith request for advice under AS

24.60.158

or

24.60.160

, and may not use that information against the person in a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

. This section does not preclude the committee from acting on a complaint concerning the subject of a person’s request for advice if the complaint is brought by another person, or if the complaint arises out of conduct taking place after the advice is requested, and does not preclude the committee from using information or evidence obtained from an independent source, even if that information or evidence was also submitted with a request for advice.

History.

(§ 28 ch 127 SLA 1992)